xanz.twol
Alphabet
p p:%{mh%} b b:m t t:%{nh%} d d:n s s:%{ñh%} z z:ñ k g g:%{ng%} %'
f %{th%} x w l j
i y u e o a
í ý ú é ó á
í:i ý:y ú:u é:e ó:o á:a
%{eu%} %{eu%'%} %{eu%'%}:%{eu%}
%{iu%} %{iu%'%} %{iu%'%}:%{iu%}
%{e%?%}:e %{e%?%}:0
y:0 e:0 o:0
ý:0 é:0 ó:0
%{mh%} m %{nh%} n %{ñh%} ñ %{ng%}
;

Sets

Nasalable = p      b t      d s      z g ;
Nasalized = %{mh%} m %{nh%} n %{ñh%} ñ %{ng%} ;
Nasal    = í ý ú é ó á %{eu%'%} %{iu%'%} ;
NonNasal = i y u e o a %{eu%}   %{iu%} ;
OtherCons = f %{th%} x w l j %{mh%} m %{nh%} n %{ñh%} ñ %{ng%} ;

Definitions

V = Nasal: | NonNasal: ;
Onset = ( ? - V )* ;
Syl = Onset V ;

Rules

"nasal cons"
Cx:Cy <=> Nasal: _ ;
  where Cx in Nasalable
        Cy in Nasalized
  matched ;


"nasal vowel"
Vx:Vy <=> _ Nasalable: ;
  where Vx in Nasal
        Vy in NonNasal
  matched ;

"optional e"
%{e%?%}:0 <=> _ V ;

! TODO: nasalized conflicts with nasal vowel rule
"weak vowels"
Vx:0 <=> .#. [ Syl Syl ]+ Syl Onset _ Syl ;
         .#. Syl Onset _ Syl ;
  where Vx in ( y e o ) ;
